ext/spell/lv_LV.dic
aizbikstīt/+IM(b[JBh1C
aizdarināt/+Ib(JhBC1M
aizdipēt/+bIM(hJCB1
aizdārdēt/+I(MJhbBC1
aizgulēt/dB+M[Jg1hI
aizkasīt/b+cIg(1Bh[dJMC
aizkurināt/+BdIcMJb[Cg(h1
aizkūpēt/+bChB(JM1I
aizmanīt/hb(+I1BMJ[C
aiznest/J+I[F(8heM}4
aizplacināt/+ghb(dIcJ[MCB1
aizpukšķināt/+IbMhB(C1J
aizritināt/h+b([JgIBdCc1M
aizskalināt/+BI1([gdCchMbJ
aizslānīt/+IhB(bM1CJ
aizsolīt/+IhJbcgdB(1MC
aizspļaudīt/+(CBMh[bIJ1
aizsēdēt/+hb[1gIcBdJM
aiztīstīt/[J+Ib(BC1hM
aizvilināt/h+cIBdJ[Cb(g1M
aizčučēt/+I(d[hJgCc1bBM
aizšvīkstināt/+JbdBchI(g[1MC
aizšūdināt/hI+bc(gdBJ[1CM
aizžņaugāt/+(hC
apburt/+J(dIhMB6[5
apdarināt/B+b(hJ1IMC
apdrošināt/+gIb[Jh(cBC1dM
apdzisināt/J+Bd(hc[IbCgM1
apglūnēt/hC+IbB1(MJ
apguldināt/+JMh(dBIc[gb1C
apjādināt/+hdbBIc[gC(1JM
apkaustīt/(+JIb1hBCM
apklukstēt/h+JIbMB1C
apkurkšķēt/+b1(JIhBMC
aplasīt/+hJ(Mb[BI1C
aplipināt/+h(cdBgJbIM[1C
apmaisīt/b+BI(MhJ[1C
apmīdīt/I+h(b[JMB1C
appilināt/[+IhdcMB(1JbgC
appludināt/+(JhcId[CMbgB1
apputināt/+IbhcC[dB1(gJM
apraudāt/+hcbgBId1JM[
aprukšķēt/+B(IbJh1CM
apskaitīt/+b(J[IhMBC1
apskribināt/+IbBJh(CM1
apslīdēt/Jhb+IB(CM1
apsnaikstīt/+b[(M1IJBhC
apspīdēt/bJh+IB1(CM
apstāvēt/b1+hIBC(MJ
apsvētāt/+(hC
aptecināt/+IJ[hc(gdbM1BC
aptrupēt/+h(bBIJMC1
apvārtīt/+hbc(1gBdIJ[MC
apzvērēt/+(IMJbh1BC
apčučēt/B+(IJhb1MC
apšļakstināt/+dgIM(Jcb[BhC1
apžvadzināt/Cc+b(gIJ[BdhM1
atburkšķēt/IJ+bd[B1M(cCgh
atdunēt/(+hIbCBJM1
atglaudīt/+bh(cg[MdJI1BC
atirdināt/[b+hcdBCgM(IJ1
atklanīt/I(bBc+hC1JgdM[
atkrakšķēt/IJMB(h+b1C
atlobīt/+hcbgd[CBMJI1(
atmēdīt/+(BIch[b1dgMJC
atprasīt/b+cIhMg[(dBJ1C
atrakstīt/+dbgBIJ[hMc1(C
atsildīt/+JbghdBI1(c[CM
atsmirdēt/I(+JbhM1CB
atstaipīt/+IJbg(dc[1BhMC
attarkšķināt/+cbChJgI(Bd[1M
aturkšķēt/bIB+hC(1JM
atvilināt/+hdIbc[gB1(JCM
atčaukstināt/+dB[IhcMb(gJ1C
atķept/I+hBe8(JM4
atšķobīt/JgbI1hdB+M(cC
atūjināt/+dBh(Cc1IbgM[J
baudīt/+bcgIJ(h1MBCd
burkšķēt/[(c+bIdhMJgCB1
cīnīt/+JBIh(dcbg1[CM
dirnēt/(+bMIhB1JC
dzesināt/+gb(Bd[JhcCIM1
džinkstēt/h+IbJBM1C
grandēt/(+IbhMJC1B
gūstīt/+gIb(cJhd[BM1C
ieburt/+hIM[(B56J
iedimdēt/+bI(Jhc1gMC[Bd
iedzirkstēt/hg+bd[c1IJBMC
iegruzdēt/I+(MJhBbC1
iekabināt/+IgbcdB(1JhM[C
ieklīdināt/C+hcIgB1(dMb[J
iekveldināt/+([bcJIBdh1gMC
ielocīt/h(bdg+IJ[B1M
iemīdīt/+hI(cbdgJMB1C
iepilēt/Ch+b1B(JIM
iepurkšķināt/Cc+1(BIJdgMb[h
ieritināt/+MhbIdB[cCgJ(1
ieslacināt/+Bdb[cMJ(hgIC1
iesniegt/+ha%I(J6dM8B5
iestatīt/+bdJgcMh(IBC1
iesēdināt/+I(CbchBdMgJ[1
ietrīsēt/hcC+bgIB1d([JM
ievedināt/Bd+bMIch[gJ(C1
iezubrīt/Hg$+)(chbdIJ1BGMC
iečīkstināt/g+Mb(hIB[Jc1Cd
iešķetināt/dB+bhgI(JcC[M1
ieņaudēt/+dBc(MIhJ[gbC1
izaugt/I+a(h8JMB4
izburzīt/+I(MdBcJhgbC1
izdibināt/+cb[JIdBM(g1hC
izdēdēt/+bh(BIJ1MC
izgrūstīt/J(BI[h+cbd1gMC
izkarināt/M(b+Chd[cJgI1B
izklāstīt/+(IbhB1JMC
izkurkstēt/hJ+bcMI[BgdC1
izliedināt/+hcC(d[JbMBIg1
izmetināt/+(hcCIJbMBdg[1
izostīt/+bgdh(M[cCBIJ1
izplivināt/bhcC(J[+MgdIB1
izpurkšķināt/b+J(B1MICh
izraust/+eh[FM
izsausināt/+(B1ghIbMdCc[J
izslidināt/I+hbcdBg(JM1C[
izspridzēt/+bIhCJM(B1
izstāvēt/I+d[(1gbhBMJcC
iztaustīt/+JcIb[dBh(1CgM
iztrūcināt/+bBhJ1(ICM
izvaukšķēt/h+bC(MBJ1I
izvēkšķēt/hb+J1gdBI(McC[
izčiepstēt/hJbI+1BMC
izķiķināt/(d+hMBCc1Ibg[J
izšļakstēt/hIB+bMCJ1
izžvadzināt/+h(1IBCcbgJ[dM
karināt/+cMdhb(CJI1g[B
klikšķēt/+bdIc(1ghB[CJM
krakšķināt/h+b[J(cCIdB1gM
kutināt/+(Jhcb[IdMgCB1
laizīt/cIh+Mgbd1B[CJ(
lēnināt/h+cgCI(b[Bd1JM
minēt/I+[bMgBdhCc(J1
mēdīt/BI+hc(bd1CJg[M
nobadīt/(cB+dIhb4g1MJ[C
nobrīdināt/+h(MbIJC1B
nodancināt/(1IBhb+CMJ
nodrošināt/hJC[+g(bdIMc1B
nodēdēt/h+b(IB1JMC
nograndēt/+(IJhb1BMC
noildzināt/h+IcMgdbB(C1[J
noklabēt/+(BIbh1JMC
noklīdināt/I+gc(CMbhJB[d1
nokrikšķēt/I(h+dgbJcBMC[1
nokņudināt/Ic+hbJ[M(gdB1C
nolēnināt/+hbcIg(BdC[1MJ
nomurmināt/+Ic(1BhdJ[MgCb
nopeldēt/+gbIc(dB[JhC1M
noplunkšķēt/hJC+bI(1BM
nopīkstēt/hIB+dbcJgM1[C
norukšķēt/bc(+J[ghIMBdC1
noskaldīt/+(gcbh[CBIdJM1
nosludināt/+bhgMc[C(Jd1IB
nosodīt/+bhcIB(dM1gJC
nostaipīt/(+c[JgIB1MhbdC
nosusināt/BdMb+I1([ghCcJ
notaisīt/+bJIch(Bd[g1MC
notrulināt/+(h[cdbMJI1BCg
notīstīt/+(hBIgbcMJC1d[
novidžināt/+IcChB([1dJbgM
nozibināt/+hbMgd[I(1JBcC
nočirkstēt/h+IBbJM1C
noķircināt/+(1IBcJghbC[dM
nošķaidīt/+cIh[Mgd(bB1JC
nošūdināt/h+(IbgB[dc1CJM
nīcināt/+(BIhbM1JC
pabiedināt/+bgdBIhcC(1M[J
pabužināt/C+chb[dIgMBJ(1
padaudzināt/+([hCcIMgBdbJ1
padurt/I+h(B6J5M
padīdīt/+chMI(bg1BJd[C
pagramstīt/+(JdhbIBMg1c[C
pairdināt/JcCbh+I(Bdg1M[
pakladzināt/+BcI(bhgd1[JCM
paknakšķēt/h+(bIJCMB1
pakuplināt/hbCg(BI+1Mcd[J
pakņudēt/I+(bMhBJ1C
palielīt/+[gCBhIbMc4d(J1
pamazināt/J+Ibdcg(hCB1M[
pamēģināt/1g+[(IbdchBCJM
paplacināt/+BdbI1g(chJ[MC
papriecināt/(gbhc+dBM[I1JC
parakstīt/+[hBd(bgIc1JMC
parādīt/(+MIBcdbg1J[hC
paskapstēt/hBbI+MCJ1
paslānīt/+Mc(bIB1dJ[hgC
paspert/JM+dB[h5I6(
pastatīt/+bhIJgM[dBc1(C
pasvepstēt/hI+bBJ1MC
patapināt/b(+hMBdJgI1[cC
patramdīt/+b(IhcdgJM1B[C
patīrīt/cJ+(bdhB[g1IMC
pavedāt/h+C
pavēdināt/+hCc(I1gBdb[MJ
paēdāt/h+C
pačākstēt/hIBM+bJ1C
pašattīrīt/c1gIhBdbMJ[(C
pašķirstīt/hb+JI1B([MC
paņerkstēt/hb+IBdgc1[CJM
piebaidīt/(+Ib1gd[hcMBJC
piedimdināt/+MJ[hdcbgI(B1C
pieglāstīt/Mbh+IcB1(g[dCJ
pieklidzināt/(hI+MJbB1C
pielaistīt/+IMc[Jhgd1b(BC
piemitināt/hI(B+dCgbc1MJ[
piepludināt/+cb(gIBM[d1hJC
pierasināt/Cc(Bd[J+bMgIh1
piesildīt/I+(Bbh1Mc[JdgC
piesmirdināt/+bgcdJ(hICB1[M
piestāvēt/+I1BhJ(bCM
pietrinkšķināt/I+bdBJgc[C(h1M
pieēdāt/hC+
piešļakstīt/IgbB+MJhd([c14C
plaukšķināt/h+JIgc[d(BbCM1
pretstatīt/+ch[b(IMg1BdJC
pārasināt/+bJcBI1(hC[gdM
pārbriedināt/(JcMb+gd[hI1BC
pārdimdināt/+Jh(gcdB[bI1MC
pārdēdēt/+hIJb(B1CM
pārguldīt/+(bIJ1gdBhM[cC
pārklabināt/+dBbg(Ic[M1JhC
pārkulstīt/cI+dJ[1gCBbh(M
pārlaistīt/c+bh[gdBI1(JCM
pārmijāt/+h
pārpilēt/b(+IJMBhC1
pārraugāt/+(Ch
pārskaitīt/+(hgcIbCB1[MdJ
pārsmaržināt/(bgIB+h[dc1JMC
pārspārdīt/+dIbJ[Bghc(1MC
pārsvilināt/+bIhcJ[gBdC(M1
pārtipināt/+IhJ[Mbcdg(1BC
pārvandīt/+1gIdBCh[cMb(J
pārzvalstīt/+(IJ[hbM1BC
pāršaudīt/I+bh(Mc1Bd[gJC
pāržvadzināt/+cChbB(IMd1g[J
raugāt/+C(h
rādīt/+(IBdch1CbJg[M
sabirdināt/+(dBMcgb[hJIC1
sacepināt/h+gbMcBd(I[CJ1
sadirnēt/b+hCJIB1(M
sadēdēt/h+(JbBMI1C
sagrūstīt/+cd1g(bIh[BMJC
sakaisīt/(+hbdgJ[BcIM1C
saklukstēt/h+gBdI[cbMJ1C
sakratīt/+M(bdBcC[IhJ1g
sakārpīt/b+[I(cdMhJB1gC
salidināt/d(gb+hJcCIBM1[
samazināt/J+[I1g(hbcCBdM
samurmināt/+hMgcIdB[(bJ1C
sapilināt/bMI+chg[B(CJd1
sapukšķināt/+bhJC(BI1M
saraudāt/+I1gBdbhc[JM
sarībēt/+bh1IB(MJC
saskraidīt/+cJbgIBhM(C1d[
sasmailināt/c+bJh[dMBI(1gC
saspridzināt/+I(1gBhcCJMbd[
sastīvināt/+IJB(1hbgdcC[M
sataisīt/bc+IB(hg1dMJ[C
satrīsēt/+Ih1b(JBCM
savaldzināt/+h1(BId[JgcCbM
savārīt/J(+bgcIh[MdB1C
sačabēt/(+bhJCMB1I
saķircināt/+(IcgJbCd[1hBM
sašķidrināt/+hCI(B[cd1bMgJ
saņemt/d+(h[BJIM
skanēt/M+bI(CBhJ1
slaucīt/bI+g1JhdBM[(
smīdināt/I(B+JhCcdgbM1[
spridzēt/hJ+MbIC(B1
strinkšķināt/+Mhb(1IB[cJgdC
svepstēt/hI+bJMB1C
tapināt/+chbBd(gJI[M1C
tracināt/[b+g(MJchIdBC1
tupēt/+(Ib1MhBJC
uzart/+h}e[(Id4BJM6
uzbubināt/+IB[b(gh1cCdJM
uzdimdināt/[+JbhgBI(1cCdM
uzgaidīt/+(IbhBM1JC
uzjautrināt/+MbchIdg[J(BC1
uzklunkšķēt/JMb+h(IB1C
uzkulstīt/Ic+[hb(g1BdMJC
uzkūpēt/h+BIb(1CMJ
uzminēt/J+IB1b(hCM
uzpeldēt/+h(MJBbIC1
uzprasīt/gb+hd(IBCJc[1M
uzraudzīt/h+bgId(M[J
uzskalināt/db+[McBIJCgh(1
uzsmailināt/+IbMJch(Bd1[Cg
uzspraudīt/+b(J1BIhMC
uzstādīt/+4cIhd[BJ1gb(MC
uztarkšķināt/+[J(cbIBdhgMC1
uzurbināt/d+BI1([JhgbMcC
uzvilināt/I+c(dbB1hJCgM[
uzēdāt/h+C
uzķiķināt/+bg(IdBhcC1J[M
uzšķirstīt/+bJhI1BM(C
uzņirbēt/b1BI+hM(JC
vaukšķēt/+MI(hbCJ1B
vājināt/[J(+ghIdbcBC1M
zināt/+MB(IhJ[b1dcCg
čaukstēt/hJbIC+BM1
čīkstināt/+gIJ(bchB1C[dM
šmaukstināt/+Jb(IBcCh[M1gd
šļakstēt/hI+Bb1JCM
ņudzēt/+(BhIbJC1M
